apertium-hin.hin.dix
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ॊऀँंःऄअआइईउऊऋऌऍऎएऐऑऒओऔकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनऩपफबभमयरऱलळऴवशषसहऺऻ़ऽािीुूृॄॅॆेैॉॊोौ्ॎॏॐ॒॑॓॔ॕॖॗक़ख़ग़ज़ड़ढ़फ़य़ॠॡॢॣॱॲॳॴॵॶॷॸॹॺॻॼॽॾ</alphabet> <!--<alphabet>ॊकिपीडियाविविहिनदीकिपीडियापरवागतहैक्तजोकोकारदेताहैहिनदीमेंलेखअआइईउऊएओऐऔऋॠऌॡऍऑपािीुूेोैौृॄॢॣॅॉपापिपीपुपूपेपोपैपौपृपॄपॢपॣपॅपॉथशबसबहुभाषीयड़ड़ढढ़</alphabet>   -->
  <sdefs>     
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>     
	<sdef n="np"      c="Proper noun"/>
	<sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
	<sdef n="al"     c="Altres"/>
	<sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>	
	<sdef n="top"     c="Topological"/>
	<sdef n="subj"    c="subject"/>
	<sdef n="org"     c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>     
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>    
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal"/>    
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="erg"     c="Ergative"/>        
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>        
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>     
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>     
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposition"/>     
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>     
	<sdef n="frm"	  c="formal"/>
	<sdef n="fam"	  c="familiar"/>

     <sdef n="acc"      c="accusative"/>
     <sdef n="ins"      c="instrumental"/>
     <sdef n="loc"      c="Locative"/> 
     <sdef n="rel"     c="Relative"/>    
     <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
     <sdef n="prx"     c="Proximate"/>
     <sdef n="dst"     c="Distal"/>          
     <sdef n="aa"      c="Animate"/>
     <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimate"/>       
     <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>     

    <sdef n="vbser"   c="Verb 'to be'"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>     
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>        
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="adverbial conjunction"/>              
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>     
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>     
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>     
    <sdef n="mf"      c=""/>        
    <sdef n="vaux"    c=""/>     
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>     
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>     
    <sdef n="sp"      c=""/>        
    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>     
    <sdef n="obl"     c="Oblique"/>        
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt"     c=""/>            
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>        
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>      
    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>     
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>     
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>      
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitive"/>     
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Present tense"/>        
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past tense"/>     
	<sdef n="impf"    c=" Imperfective participle"/>
	<sdef n="perf"     c="Perfective participle"/>     
	<sdef n="tv"     c="transitive"/> 	
	<sdef n="iv"     c="intransitive"/> 	
    <sdef n="prs"    c="Subjunctive"/>     
    <sdef n="fut"    c="Future"/>
	<sdef n="imp"    c="Imperative"/>
	<sdef n="gna"    c="verbal adverb"/>
	<sdef n="agnt"    c="agentive"/>
	<sdef n="pri"    c="present indicative"/>	 	 
	<sdef n="stem"  c="stem"/>
	<sdef n="ord"  c="ordinal"/>
	<sdef n="percent"  c="Percent"/>

    <sdef n="cm"         c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"       c="Sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"       c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"       c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"      c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"      c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="guio"       c="Hyphen"/>



  </sdefs>    
  <pardefs>        

    <!-- SECTION: Prepostions -->        
    <pardef n="गलत__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->      
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[०१२३४५६७८९]+([.,][०१२३४५६७८९]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!।॥]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guio">
      <e><re>[—\-]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e><re>[«]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[»]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Paradigm Nouns -->     
    
    <pardef n="जेम्स__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  
            
    <pardef n="मैरी__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>    
    
    <pardef n="मोटलानी__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="भारत__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="टाटा__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="उत्तर__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="मौलाना__n_m">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="सद/्__n_m">
      <e><p><l>्</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>्</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>्</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>्<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जड__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="बला__n_f">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>यें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e> <!-- 1-->
	<e><p><l>एँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	<e r="LR"><p><l>एं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>  <!-- 2-->
        <e><p><l>ओं</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ओँ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>  <!-- 3 added due to incorrect forms in input data :/ -->
    </pardef>
         
    <pardef n="दग/ा__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="खडा/ऊँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ऊँ</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊँ</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ऊँ</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>उँओं</l><r>ऊँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

	<e lm="ज़स्विन्देर्"><i>ज़स्विन्देर्</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
    <e lm="तक़ी"><i>तक़ी</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
    <e lm="इशाक"><i>इशाक</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
	<e lm="जोधा"><i>जोधा</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="खन्ना"><i>खन्ना</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
    	<e lm="ख़ां"><i>ख़ां</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
	<e lm="हिलेरी"><i>हिलेरी</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="उत्तर"><i>उत्तर</i><par n="उत्तर__np"/></e>
    	<e lm="दक्षिण"><i>दक्षिण</i><par n="उत्तर__np"/></e>
    	<e lm="पश्चिम"><i>पश्चिम</i><par n="उत्तर__np"/></e>
	<e lm="ईस्ट"><i>ईस्ट</i><par n="उत्तर__np"/></e>
    <e lm="मिर्जा"><i>मिर्जा</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="शाहजहां"><i>शाहजहां</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
	<e lm="द्विवेदी"><i>द्विवेदी</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="वैशाली"><i>वैशाली</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="इमाम-ए-आज़म"><i>इमाम-ए-आज़म</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
	<e lm="बच्चन"><i>बच्चन</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="शेरिल"><i>शेरिल</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="महादेवी"><i>महादेवी</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="शिवाजी"><i>शिवाजी</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
	<e lm="ऑस्टिन"><i>ऑस्टिन</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="मुमताज"><i>मुमताज</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="दत्त"><i>दत्त</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="सैंडबर्ग"><i>सैंडबर्ग</i><par n="मोटलानी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="भारती"><i>भारती</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
	<e lm="फ़ेसबुक"><i>फ़ेसबुक</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="गूगल"><i>गूगल</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="माइक्रोसॉफ्ट"><i>माइक्रोसॉफ्ट</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="वॉट्स-ऐप"><i>वॉट्स-ऐप</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="विकिपीडिया"><i>विकिपीडिया</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="यूट्यूब"><i>यूट्यूब</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="विविध भारती"><i>विविध<b/>भारती</i><par n="टाटा__np"/></e>
	<e lm="अमृतसर"><i>अमृतसर</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
	<e lm="कोरिया"><i>कोरिया</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
	<e lm="बोस‌निया और‌ ह‌र्ज़ेगोविना"><i>बोस‌निया<b/>और‌<b/>ह‌र्ज़ेगोविना</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
	<e lm="आइस‌लैंड‌"><i>आइस‌लैंड‌</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
	<e lm="पानामा"><i>पानामा</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
	<e lm="वानुआतु"><i>वानुआतु</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
    <e lm="जॉर्जस्"><i>जॉर्जस्</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
	<e lm="मौलाना"><i>मौलाना</i><par n="मौलाना__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="दराज"><i>दराज</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="परिपृच्छा"><i>परिपृच्छा</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="लकवा"><i>लकव</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पृथक्"><i>पृथक</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="ट्रैन"><i>ट्रैन</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="नीलसर"><i>नीलसर</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
	<e lm="स्टपवच"><i>स्टपवच</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="वृहत्"><i>वृहत</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="हत्या"><i>हत्या</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हरजाना"><i>हरजान</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तरजीह"><i>तरजीह</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="काया"><i>काया</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="चंद्रमा"><i>चंद्रमा</i><par n="मौलाना__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चन्द्रमा"><i>चन्द्रमा</i><par n="मौलाना__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिभावान्"><i>प्रतिभावान</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सामना"><i>सामन</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="निमोनिया"><i>निमोनिय</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वायुसेना"><i>वायुसेना</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्दिश"><i>गर्दिश</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दंडवत्"><i>दंडवत</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्"><i>सत</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="बीमा"><i>बीम</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तूलिका"><i>तूलिका</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भगवान्"><i>भगवान</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="सीख"><i>सीख</i><par n="जड__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="संभावना"><i>संभावना</i><par n="बला__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाषाविद्"><i>भाषाविद</i><par n="सद/्__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मुआवजा"><i>मुआवज</i><par n="दग/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm=","><i>,</i><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guio"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
